Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-368
Cost of patient care; ability to pay;
factors.

Except as provided in section 71-809,
the department shall determine the ability of a patient to pay
by consideration of the following factors: (1) Taxable income reportable under
Nebraska law; (2) the patient's age; (3) the number of his or her dependents
and their ages and mental and physical conditions; (4) the patient's length
of care or treatment; (5) his or her liabilities; and (6) his or her assets
including health insurance coverage.

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 6, p. 3053;

Laws 1985, LB 487, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB871, § 3.